Washington statutes.
RCW 2.08.061

Judges—King, Spokane, and Pierce counties.

There shall be in the county of King no more than fifty-eight judges of the superior court; in the county of Spokane thirteen judges of the superior court; and in the county of Pierce twenty-four judges of the superior court.

[ 1997 c 347 s 3; 1996 c 208 s 3; 1992 c 189 s 1; 1989 c 328 s 2; 1987 c 323 s 1; 1985 c 357 s 1; 1980 c 183 s 1; 1979 ex.s. c 202 s 1; 1977 ex.s. c 311 s 1; 1973 1st ex.s. c 27 s 1; 1971 ex.s. c 83 s 5; 1969 ex.s. c 213 s 1; 1967 ex.s. c 84 s 1; 1963 c 48 s 1; 1961 c 67 s 1; 1955 c 176 s 1; 1951 c 125 s 3. Prior: 1949 c 237 ss 1, 3; 1933 ex.s. c 63 s 1; 1927 c 135 s 1, part; 1925 ex.s. c 66 s 1; 1911 c 76 s 1; 1909 c 52 s 1; 1909 c 12 s 1; 1909 c 10 s 1; 1907 c 106 s 1; 1907 c 79 s 1, part; 1905 c 9 s 1; 1895 c 89 s 1, part; 1891 c 68 s 2; 1890 p 341 s 1, part; Rem. Supp. 1949 ss 11045-1f, 11045-1h; RRS ss 11045-1, 11045-1a, part.]

NOTES:

Starting dates of additional judicial positions in Spokane county—Effective, starting dates of additional judicial positions in Pierce county—1997 c 347: "(1) The additional judicial positions created by section 3 of this act for the county of Spokane take effect upon July 27, 1997, but the actual starting dates for these positions may be established by the Spokane county commissioners upon the request of the superior court.

(2) The additional positions created by section 3 of this act for the county of Pierce, take effect as follows: One additional judicial position is effective January 1, 1998; two positions are effective January 1, 1999; and two positions are effective January 1, 2000. The actual starting dates for these positions may be established by the Pierce county council upon request of the superior court and by recommendation of the Pierce county executive." [ 1997 c 347 s 4.]

Additional judicial position in Spokane county subject to approval and agreement—1996 c 208: "The additional judicial position created by section 3 of this act shall be effective only if Spokane county through its duly constituted legislative authority documents its approval of the additional position and its agreement that it will pay out of county funds, without reimbursement from the state, the expenses of the additional judicial position as provided by statute." [ 1996 c 208 s 4.]

Effective dates—1992 c 189: "(1) Sections 1, 3, and 5 of this act shall take effect July 1, 1992.

(2) The remainder of this act shall take effect July 1, 1993." [ 1992 c 189 s 7.]

Additional judicial positions subject to approval and agreement—1992 c 189: "The additional judicial positions created by sections 1, 2, 3, 4, and 5 of this act shall be effective only if each county through its duly constituted legislative authority documents its approval of any additional positions and its agreement that it will pay out of county funds, without reimbursement from the state, the expenses of such additional judicial positions as provided by statute." [ 1992 c 189 s 8.]

Intent—1989 c 328: "The legislature recognizes the dramatic increase in cases filed in superior court over the last six years in King, Pierce, and Snohomish counties. This increase has created a need for more superior court judges in those counties.

The increased caseload at the superior court level has also caused a similar increase in the case and petition filings in the court of appeals. Currently, the additional caseload is being handled by pro tempore judges and excessive caseloads for permanent judges. The addition of a permanent full-time judge will allow the court to more efficiently process the growing caseload.

By the creation of these additional positions, it is the intent of the legislature to promote the careful judicial review of cases by an elected judiciary." [ 1989 c 328 s 1.]

Additional judicial positions subject to approval and agreement—1989 c 328: "The additional judicial positions created by sections 2 and 3 of this act in Pierce and Snohomish counties shall be effective only if the county through its duly constituted legislative authority documents its approval of any additional positions and its agreement that it will pay out of county funds, without reimbursement from the state, the expenses of such additional judicial positions as provided by statute. The additional expenses include, but are not limited to, expenses incurred for court facilities." [ 1989 c 328 s 5.]

Effective dates for additional judicial positions—1989 c 328 ss 2 and 3: "(1) Three additional judicial positions created by section 2 of this 1989 act shall be effective January 1, 1990.

(2) One additional judicial position created by section 3 of this act shall be effective July 1, 1990; the second position shall be effective not later than June 30, 1991." [ 1989 c 328 s 7.]

Effective dates—Additional judicial positions in King, Chelan, and Douglas counties subject to approval and agreement—1989 c 328; 1987 c 323: "Sections 1 and 2 of this act shall take effect January 1, 1988. The additional judicial positions created by sections 1 and 2 of this act in King county and Chelan and Douglas counties shall be effective only if each county through its duly constituted legislative authority documents its approval of any additional positions and its agreement that it will pay out of county funds, without reimbursement from the state, the expenses of such additional judicial positions as provided by statute. The additional expenses include, but are not limited to, expenses incurred for court facilities. The legislative authorities of Chelan and Douglas counties may in their discretion phase in any additional judicial positions over a period of time not to extend beyond January 1, 1990. The legislative authority of King county may in its discretion phase in any additional judicial positions over a period of time not to extend beyond January 1, 1991." [ 1989 c 328 s 6; 1987 c 323 s 5.]

Effective dates—Additional judicial positions in Pierce, Clark, and Snohomish counties subject to approval and agreement—1985 c 357: "(1) Sections 1 and 2 of this act shall take effect January 1, 1987. The additional judicial positions created by sections 1 and 2 of this act in Pierce and Clark counties shall be effective only if, prior to January 1, 1987, each county through its duly constituted legislative authority documents its approval of the additional positions and its agreement that it will pay out of county funds, without reimbursement from the state, the expenses of such additional judicial positions as provided by statute. The additional expenses include, but are not limited to, expenses incurred for court facilities.

(2) Section 3 of this act shall take effect January 1, 1986. The additional judicial position created by section 3 of this act in Snohomish county shall be effective only if, prior to January 1, 1986, the county through its duly constituted legislative authority documents its approval of the additional position and its agreement that it will pay out of county funds, without reimbursement from the state, the expenses of such additional judicial position as provided by statute. The additional expenses include, but are not limited to, expenses incurred for court facilities." [ 1985 c 357 s 4.]

Effective date—1977 ex.s. c 311: "This 1977 amendatory act shall take effect November 1, 1977." [ 1977 ex.s. c 311 s 6.]